Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 2281.
Annual audit; reports; control of funds.

The books and accounts of the University of Vermont and State Agricultural College shall be audited annually as of June 30 by an independent accounting firm registered in the State of Vermont in accordance with government auditing standards issued by the U.S. Government Accountability Office (GAO). The Auditor of Accounts or his or her designee shall be the State’s nonvoting representative to an audit committee established by the Board.

, (c)[Repealed.]

(d)

Control of funds appropriated and of the work carried on shall be vested in the Board of Trustees of the University of Vermont and State Agricultural College.

(e)

The University of Vermont and State Agricultural College shall provide an accounting service that shall account for the expenditures by divisions.

(f)

Control of funds appropriated shall be vested in the Board of Trustees of the University of Vermont and State Agricultural College. All funds appropriated to the Agricultural College shall be kept in a separate account and shall be audited annually by an independent accounting firm registered in the State of Vermont in accordance with government auditing standards issued by the U.S. Government Accountability Office.

HISTORY:

Amended

2007, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2007, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 6, 10;

2009, No. 33

, §§ 36, 83(g)(4);

2015, No. 23

, § 40.

§ 2282.
Repealed. 2015, No. 172 (Adj. Sess.), § E.600.1.

§ 2282a.
Determination of residency for tuition purposes.

Enrollment at an institution for higher learning, or presence within the State for the purposes of attending an institution of higher learning, shall not by itself constitute residence for in-state tuition purposes or for the purpose of eligibility for assistance from the Vermont Student Assistance Corporation.

Any member of the Armed Forces of the United States on active duty who is transferred to Vermont for duty other than for the purpose of education shall, upon transfer and for the period of active duty served in Vermont, be considered a resident for in-state tuition purposes at the start of the next semester or academic period.

HISTORY:

1971, No. 184

(Adj. Sess.), § 30, eff. March 29, 1972; amended

2003, No. 127

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2283.
Department of Police Services.

The Board of Trustees may establish a Department of Police Services and authorize the appointment to the Department of police officers and a director of the Department who shall be a police officer. Officers so appointed shall be sworn and shall have all law enforcement powers provided by

24 V.S.A. § 1935

. Appointments and oaths shall be in writing and shall be filed with and maintained by the Board of Trustees of the University of Vermont and State Agricultural College. The director shall have free and direct access to the Board of Trustees on matters pertaining to law enforcement.

An officer appointed pursuant to this section shall have no law enforcement authority until satisfactory completion of a course of training pursuant to 20 V.S.A. chapter 151. The University of Vermont shall have access to training programs offered pursuant to 20 V.S.A. chapter 151 upon the same terms and conditions as municipal police officers. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the Board of Trustees or its duly authorized representative from requiring additional qualification or training as a condition of initial or continuing appointment.

An officer appointed under authority of this section shall be an employee of the University of Vermont and shall be subject to such terms and conditions of employment as are imposed by the Board of Trustees or its duly authorized representative. An officer so appointed may exercise law enforcement authority only while employed in good standing by the University of Vermont.

Upon written complaint of misconduct by one or more persons concerning any police officer appointed under this section, the director of the Department shall cause an investigation to be conducted in a manner consistent with the policies and procedures established by the Board of Trustees or its duly authorized representative for such purposes. The complainant may appeal the final action of the department to the President of the University of Vermont, who shall convene an advisory commission consisting of three persons, no more than one of whom has a direct or indirect University affiliation. The advisory commission shall provide advice and counsel to the President in assuring appropriate final disposition of the complaint.

Without limiting the powers described in subsection (a) of this section, the Department of Police Services may, for the purpose of coordinating effective law enforcement services, enter into any arrangements or agreements with any municipality if deemed necessary or appropriate by the Board of Trustees or its duly authorized representative.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.); amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 95.

§ 2284.
Repealed. 2009, No. 106 (Adj. Sess.), § 2(2), eff. May 13, 2010.

§ 2285.
Nonapplicability of certain requirements for payment of wages.

Except as expressly provided in this chapter, the University of Vermont and State Agricultural College and its Board of Trustees, officers, and employees shall not be subject to the provisions of

21 V.S.A. § 342(c)

that require written employee authorization before an employer may pay wages through electronic funds transfer or other direct deposit systems to a checking, savings, or other deposit account maintained by the employee within or outside the State.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 48

, § 4a.